Mississippi, session 2026, HB191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the State Department of Education shall allocate sufficient funding under the Mississippi Student Funding Formula to those school districts designated under subsection (2) of this section for the purpose of employing a social worker. (2)  The State Department of Education shall designate school districts to receive an allocation for the purpose of employing a social worker.  The districts must be selected according to greatest need, as indicated by records of the State Department of Education and the Division of Youth Services of the Department of Human Services which reflect those school districts having the highest incidences of crime, violence, Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) participation and unemployment. (3)  The State Department of Education may increase the number of social worker positions funded each year beyond the above requirements as additional funding is made available. (4)  Any individual employed by a school district with funds allotted under this section must be licensed appropriately as a social worker under Chapter 53, Title 73, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The State Department of Education shall specify which license a social worker must hold as a qualification for being employed in a position funded under this section. (5)  To qualify for total funding formula funds, school social workers must be full-time professional personnel and must spend at least seventy-five percent (75%) of their work time in a direct relationship with students.  School social workers may not devote more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the work day to administrative activities related to their social work. (6)  The State Board of Education may adopt rules and regulations regarding the activities of the school social workers.  School social workers may perform services that are not inconsistent with those rules and regulations. (7)  This section does not prohibit a school district from employing social workers with local funds. SECTION 2. (1)  The State Department of Education and the Department of Human Services, acting jointly, shall establish a program to make certain services by licensed social workers available in the public schools throughout the state.  Under the program, the Department of Human Services shall employ ten (10) social workers who meet the licensing qualifications established by the State Department of Education for school social workers.  The social workers must be housed in the Department of Human Services, which is responsible for operating the program, and must be accessible to schools throughout the state via video conferencing means. (2)  Whenever a school guidance counselor identifies a crisis or other need within the school setting which merits the guidance and counseling of a licensed social worker and the school district involved does not employ a social worker, the counselor may contact the office of the social workers employed under subsection (1) of this section to make arrangements for the necessary guidance and counseling services.  The counselor shall provide any information as may be necessary for the social worker to assess the specific situation in the school.  If the counselor and social worker determine that the services of the social worker are appropriate, the school guidance counselor, in consultation with the social worker, shall schedule a conference with all interested parties, during which the social worker shall participate in the meeting through video conferencing means. (3)  Whenever services are provided by a social worker via video conferencing means under this section, the school guidance counselor shall take any precautions as may be necessary to afford the person or persons receiving guidance and counseling services the same confidentiality and privacy protections to which those persons otherwise would be entitled. SECTION 3.  Section 37-151-209, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-151-209.  (1) Allocations to school districts or charter schools made by the State Department of Education on the basis of the count of students in student categories established for the purpose of applying various weights under Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 are intended only to generate total appropriation amounts for school funding.  Except as otherwise required by applicable state or federal law or by applicable rules, regulations, policies, or order of the State Board of Education and the State Department of Education, a school district or charter school may exercise full autonomy in the spending of all funds allocated under the formula to the district or charter school so long as funds are expended in the manner determined by the school board or governing board to best meet the needs of the student population of the school district or charter school. (2)  The State Department of Education shall allocate sufficient funds under the total funding formula to designated school districts for the purpose of employing a social worker, as provided for in Section 1 of this act. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.